cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k vrtačkám > Vrtáky: Vrtáky do zdiva; Bity pro šroubováky; Spirálové vrtáky
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai > Grąžtai ir atsuktuvų antgaliai: Mūro grąžtai; Atsuktuvų antgaliai; Medžio grąžtai
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Bohrzubehör > Bohrer & Bits: Steinbohrer; Bits; Spiralbohrer
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов > Сверла для дрелей и биты для шуруповертов: Сверла по бетону; Биты для шуруповертов; Спиральные сверла
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per trapani e cacciavite > Punte di trapano e cacciavite: Punte da trapano per muratura; Punte per cacciavite; Punte da trapano elicoidali
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง > ดอกสว่านและดอกไขควง: ดอกสว่านเจาะปูน; ดอกไขควง; ดอกสว่านเกลียว
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Bor – tilbehør > Borebit: Murerbor; Skruetrækkerbits; Spiralbor
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses > Forets et embouts de tournevis: Forets à maçonnerie; Embouts de tournevis; Forets hélicoïdaux
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom > Vrtáky a skrutkovače: Vrtáky do muriva; Bity do skrutkovačov; Otočné vrtáky
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ドリル関連用品 > ドリルビット: Masonryドリルビット; ドライバービット; ツイストドリルビット
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores > Brocas de taladro y cabezales de destornillador: Brocas para mampostería; Puntas de destornillador; Brocas helicoidales
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za bušilice i odvijače > Svrdla za bušilice i odvijače: Zidarska svrdla; Svrdla za odvijače; Spiralna svrdla
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavida Uçları: Duvar Matkap Uçları; Tornavida Uçları; Büküm Matkap Uçları
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Booraccessoires > Boortjes: Steenboortjes; Schroevendraaiertjes; Spiraalboortjes
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe > Burghie și șurubelnițe: Burghie pentru zidărie; Șurubelnițe; Burghie elicoidale
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere > Bits for driller og skrutrekkere: Murborbits; Skrutrekkerbits; Vriborbits
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen kärjet: Seinäporanterät; Ruuvimeisselin terät; Kierreporanterät
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít > Mũi khoan & Mũi vít: Mũi khoan xây; Mũi vít; Mũi khoan xoắn
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare > Borr- och skruvdragarbits: Tegelborr; Skruvmejselstål; Vridborr
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти > Накрайници за бормашини и винтоверти: Свредла за зидария; Накрайници за винтоверти; Спирални свредла
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para furadeiras > Brocas para furadeiras: Brocas para alvenaria; Pontas de parafusadeira; Brocas helicoidais
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó bitek: Falazófúróbitek; Csavarhúzó bitek; Csavart fúróbitek
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 電鑽/電動起子配件 > 鑽頭: 水泥鑽頭; 螺絲起子頭; 麻花鑽頭
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件 > 钻头/螺丝刀头: 砌体钻头; 螺丝刀头; 麻花钻头
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품 > 드릴/드라이버 날: 벽돌 드릴 날; 드라이버 날; 트위스트 드릴 날
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών > Μύτες τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών: Μύτες τρυπανιών τοιχοποιίας; Μύτες κατσαβιδιών; Μύτες περιστρεφόμενων τρυπανιών
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Bits: Masonry Drill Bits; Screwdriver Bits; Twist Drill Bits
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike > Nastavki za vrtalnike in vijačnike: Svedri za beton; Vijačni nastavki; Vrtalni svedri
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do wiercenia > Wiertła: Wiertła udarowe; Bity wkrętakowe; Wiertła standardowe
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas > Pontas de berbequim e chave de fendas: Pontas de berbequim para alvenaria; Pontas de chave de fendas; Pontas de berbequim helicoidais